New Jersey, session 221, S3428.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Division of Fire Safety in the Department of Community Affairs shall adopt Coast Guard approved basic, advanced, and in-service marine firefighting training courses for land-based firefighters. The division shall require each firefighter, volunteer or paid, who is engaged in fire suppression, firefighting, or fire rescue in a municipality located within a coastal zone to complete the training courses established in this subsection. b.    Recruit firefighter training programs shall include the basic marine firefighting training course established in subsection a. of this section. A firefighter who has completed a recruit firefighter training program prior to the effective date of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be required to complete the basic marine firefighting training course established in subsection a. of this section within one year of the effective date of this act. A firefighter shall be required to complete: (1)  the advanced marine firefighting training course established in subsection a. of this section within two years of completing the basic marine firefighting course; and (2)  the in-service training established in subsection a. of this section on a biennial basis thereafter. c.     The division shall adopt a Coast Guard approved training course for qualification as an instructor of marine firefighting for land-based firefighters. A firefighter who has completed the basic and advanced training courses and is in compliance with the in-service training requirement established in subsection a. of this section, or otherwise has been certified by the division, shall be eligible for marine firefighting instruction training. Upon completion of the training established pursuant to this subsection or other certification by the division, a firefighter shall be qualified to provide the basic, advanced, and in-service marine firefighting training courses established in subsection a. of this section and the instruction training course established pursuant to this subsection. d.  For the purposes of this section, a municipality located within a coastal zone means any municipality included in the State's Coastal Management program, as part of its implementation of the "Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972," 16 U.S.C. s.1451 et seq. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Community Affairs $140,000,000 to be used for the purposes set forth in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.